Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.630

Application of chapter to canners, freezers, pressers, dehydrators of fruit or vegetables.

Except for the provisions of this chapter relating to levying, collecting, and paying assessments, nothing in this chapter shall apply to any person engaged in the canning, freezing, pressing, or dehydrating of fresh fruit or vegetables.

[ 1985 c 261 s 16; 1961 c 256 s 63.]